Illinois, session 104th, HB1369.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Caring 5for Caregivers Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions.7    "Activities of daily living" means:8        (1) ambulating, which means the ability of an 9    individual to move from one position to another and to 10    walk independently;11        (2) feeding, which means the ability of an individual 12    to feed himself or herself;13        (3) dressing, which means the ability to select 14    appropriate clothes and to put the clothes on without aid;15        (4) personal hygiene, which means the ability to bathe 16    and groom oneself and to maintain dental hygiene and nail 17    and hair care;18        (5) continence, which means the ability to control 19    bladder and bowel function; and20        (6) toileting, which means the ability to get to and 21    from the toilet without aid and to use it appropriately.22    "Department" means the Department of Revenue.23    "Eligible expenditure" means the following when directly   HB1369- 2 -LRB104 05140 HLH 15169 b1related to assisting the family caregiver in providing care to 2an eligible family member:3        (1) the improvement or alteration to the family 4    caregiver's or eligible family member's primary residence 5    to permit the eligible family member to live in the 6    residence and to remain mobile, safe, and independent;7        (2) the family caregiver's purchase or lease of 8    equipment, including, but not limited to, durable medical 9    equipment, that is necessary to assist an eligible family 10    member in carrying out one or more activities of daily 11    living; and12        (3) other expenses paid or incurred by the family 13    caregiver that assist the family caregiver in providing 14    care to an eligible family member, including, but not 15    limited to, expenses related to:16            (A) obtaining respite care;17            (B) obtaining adult day care;18            (C) hiring a personal care attendant;19            (D) hiring a home care aide;20            (E) purchasing durable medical equipment;21            (F) obtaining transportation; and22            (G) acquiring assistive technology or other 23        technology.24    Expenses incurred in carrying out general household 25maintenance activities, such as painting, plumbing, electrical 26repairs, or exterior maintenance, are not considered eligible   HB1369- 3 -LRB104 05140 HLH 15169 b1expenditures under this Act unless those expenditures qualify 2under item (1) of this definition.3    "Eligible family member" means an individual who meets all 4of the following:5        (1) the individual is a resident of the State;6        (2) the individual is at least 60 years of age;7        (3) the individual requires assistance with at least 2 8    activities of daily living, as certified by a licensed 9    health care provider;10        (4) the individual qualifies as a dependent, spouse, 11    parent, or other relation of the family caregiver by 12    blood, marriage, or civil union, including an in-law, 13    sibling, grandparent, grandchild, stepparent, stepchild, 14    aunt, uncle, niece, nephew of the family caregiver, or an 15    individual whose close association with the family 16    caregiver is the equivalent of a family relationship; and17        (5) the individual lives in a private residential home 18    and not in an assisted living center, nursing facility, or 19    residential care home.20    "Family caregiver" means an individual who meets all of 21the following:22        (1) the individual is an Illinois resident and 23    taxpayer;24        (2) the individual provides care and support for an 25    eligible family member;26        (3) the individual has a federal adjusted gross income   HB1369- 4 -LRB104 05140 HLH 15169 b1    for the taxable year of less than $50,000 for an 2    individual and less than $100,000 for spouses filing a 3    joint income tax return; and4        (4) the individual has personally incurred 5    uncompensated eligible expenditures directly related to 6    the care of an eligible family member.7    "Veteran" means an individual who has served as a member 8of the United States Armed Forces on active duty or State 9active duty, a member of the Illinois National Guard, or a 10member of the United States Reserve Forces and who has 11received an honorable discharge. 12    Section 10. Credit allowed. 13    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 142026, a taxpayer who is a family caregiver and who incurs 15eligible expenditures during the taxable year for the care and 16support of an eligible family member may apply to the 17Department, in the form and manner required by the Department 18by rule, for a credit against the tax imposed by subsections 19(a) and (b) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act. 20Subject to the limitations in subsections (b) and (c), the 21credit under this Act shall be equal to 50% of the eligible 22expenditures incurred during the taxable year by the family 23caregiver for the care and support of an eligible family 24member.25    (b) The maximum allowable credit authorized by this   HB1369- 5 -LRB104 05140 HLH 15169 b1Section shall be $2,000 per taxpayer per taxable year, unless 2the eligible family member is a veteran, in which case the 3maximum allowable credit shall be $3,000 per taxable year for 4that taxpayer. The credit or credits may not reduce the 5taxpayer's liability to less than zero. Excess credit amounts 6under this Act may not be carried forward or back.7    (c) Upon approval of a credit award under this Section, 8the Department shall issue a tax credit certificate to the 9taxpayer. The taxpayer shall attach the tax credit certificate 10to the taxpayer's Illinois income tax return for the taxable 11year.12    (d) The total credits authorized under this Section for 13all taxpayers shall not exceed $1,500,000 annually.14    (e) This Act is exempt from the provisions of Section 250 15of the Illinois Income Tax Act. 16    Section 15. Report. The Department shall submit an annual 17report to the Governor and the General Assembly detailing (i) 18the total amount of tax credits claimed under this Act for the 19preceding fiscal year and (ii) the total number of taxpayers 20who received credits under this Act for the preceding fiscal 21year. The Department shall publish that report on its website 22and shall provide a copy of the report to the Department on 23Aging for publication on the Department on Aging's website. 24    Section 20. Rulemaking. The Department of Revenue shall   HB1369- 6 -LRB104 05140 HLH 15169 b1adopt rules to implement and administer the credit authorized 2by this Act. 3    Section 900. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 4adding Section 246 as follows: 5    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)6    Sec. 246. The Caring for Caregivers Act; credit. For 7taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, a 8taxpayer who is awarded a credit under the Caring for 9Caregivers Act is entitled to a credit against the tax imposed 10by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act as 11provided in the Caring for Caregivers Act.12    This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 250.  13    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 141, 2026.